Louisiana, session 2026, HB300.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 6:243(C)(1) and (2) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§243. Immovable property; dealings
* * *
C.(1) For immovable property provided for in Paragraphs (A)(2), (3), and
(4) of this Section, a state bank shall obtain, within a reasonable time before or after
the property is acquired, a current appraisal of the fair market value of any such
property and shall account for the property in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles (GAAP). For purposes of this Paragraph, a state bank may
perform an evaluation in lieu of an appraisal for residential real estate valued at or
below two hundred fifty four hundred thousand dollars and for commercial real
estate valued at or below five hundred thousand dollars.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 300 ENROLLED
(2) An additional appraisal shall be required for immovable property every
third calendar year from the date the initial appraisal was obtained pursuant to
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. For purposes of this Paragraph, a state bank may
perform an evaluation in lieu of an appraisal for residential immovable property
valued at or below two hundred fifty four hundred thousand dollars and for
commercial immovable property valued at or below five hundred thousand dollars.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.